Washington statutes.
RCW 6.36.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter: (1) "Foreign judgment" means any judgment, decree or order of a court of the United States or of any state or territory which is entitled to full faith and credit in this state.

(2) "Register" means to file a foreign judgment in a court of this state.

(3) "Levy" means to take control of or create a lien upon property under any judicial writ or process whereby satisfaction of a judgment may be enforced against such property.

(4) "Judgment debtor" means the party against whom a foreign judgment has been rendered.

[ 1953 c 191 s 1.]